Utah statutes.
64-13-19.   Labor at correctional facilities.
(1)  The department shall determine the types of labor to be pursued, and what
kind, quality, and quantity of goods, materials, and supplies shall be
produced, manufactured, or repaired at correctional facilities.  Contracts may
be made for the labor of offenders, including contracts with any federal
agency for a project affecting national defense.  As many offenders as
practicable may be employed to produce, manufacture, or repair any goods,
materials, or supplies for sale to the state or its political subdivisions.
Prices for all goods, materials, and supplies shall be fixed by the
department.
(2)  An offender performing labor under this section is not considered an
employee, worker, workman, or operative for purposes of Title 34A, Chapter 2,
Workers' Compensation Act, except as required by federal statute or
regulation.
